Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,144.03
Temporary CLP-commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license; issuance; temporary commercial driver's license; renewal.

(1) The department shall issue a CLP-commercial learner's permit or a commercial driver's license that is temporary only to any applicant who presents documentation under section 60-4,144 that shows his or her authorized stay in the United States is temporary. A CLP-commercial learner's permit or a commercial driver's license that is temporary shall be valid only during the period of time of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States or, if there is no definite end to the period of authorized stay, a period of one year.

(2) A CLP-commercial learner's permit or a commercial driver's license that is temporary shall clearly indicate that it is temporary with a special notation that states the date on which it expires.

(3) A commercial driver's license that is temporary may be renewed only upon presentation of valid documentary evidence that the status, by which the applicant qualified for the commercial driver's license that is temporary, has been extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security.

Laws 2014, LB983, § 32;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 39.